North Dakota statutes. TITLE 25 Mental and Physical Illness or Disability
CHAPTER 25-03.1 Commitment Procedures
25-03.1-17.
Involuntary treatment — Right to preliminary hearing.

A respondent who is in custody under section 25-03.1-25 and who is alleged to be a mentally ill person or to be a person who is both mentally ill and has a substance use disorder is entitled to a preliminary hearing.

At the preliminary hearing the court shall review the medical report. During the hearing the court shall allow the petitioner and the respondent an opportunity to testify and to present and cross-examine witnesses, and the court may receive the testimony of any other interested person. The court may receive evidence that would otherwise be inadmissible at a treatment hearing.

At the conclusion of the hearing, if the court does not find probable cause to believe the individual is a person requiring treatment, the court shall dismiss the petition and order the respondent be discharged from the treatment facility if the respondent was detained before the hearing.

If the court finds probable cause to believe the respondent is a person requiring treatment, the court shall consider less restrictive alternatives to involuntary detention and treatment.

The court may order the respondent to undergo up to fourteen days’ treatment under a less restrictive alternative or, if the court finds alternative treatment is not in the best interests of the respondent or others, the court shall order the respondent detained for up to fourteen days for involuntary treatment in a treatment facility.

The court shall specifically state to the respondent and give written notice that if involuntary treatment beyond the fourteen-day period is to be sought, the respondent will have the right to a treatment hearing as required by this chapter.

Except for good cause, the court may not consider medical records relating to the respondent, unless the petitioner and respondent receive the medical records at least twenty-four hours before the hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 17; 1983, ch. 314, § 2; 1989, ch. 149, § 13; 1993, ch. 279, § 9; 2015, ch. 201, § 9, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 226, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 223, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-18.
Involuntary treatment — Release.

The superintendent or the director may release a patient subject to a fourteen-day evaluation and treatment order or a seven-day emergency order if, in the superintendent’s or director’s opinion, the respondent does not meet the criteria of a person requiring treatment or, before the expiration of the fourteen-day order, the respondent no longer requires inpatient treatment. The court must be notified of the release and the reasons therefor. If the respondent is released because the respondent does not meet the criteria of a person requiring treatment, the court shall dismiss the petition.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 18; 1989, ch. 149, § 14.

25-03.1-18.1.
Court-authorized involuntary treatment with prescribed medication.

Upon notice and hearing, a tier 1b mental health professional may request authorization from the court to treat an individual under a mental health treatment order with prescribed medication. The request may be considered by the court in an involuntary treatment hearing. As a part of the request, a psychiatrist or a final year psychiatric resident physician not involved in the current diagnosis or treatment of the patient shall certify:

That the proposed prescribed medication is clinically appropriate and necessary to effectively treat the patient and that the patient is a person requiring treatment;

That the patient was offered that treatment and refused it or that the patient lacks the capacity to make or communicate a responsible decision about that treatment;

That prescribed medication is the least restrictive form of intervention necessary to meet the treatment needs of the patient; and

That the benefits of the treatment outweigh the known risks to the patient.

The court shall inquire whether the patient has had a sufficient opportunity to adequately prepare to meet the issue of involuntary treatment with prescribed medication and, at the request of the patient, the court may continue the involuntary treatment hearing for a period not exceeding seven days or may appoint an independent expert examiner as provided in subsection 4.

Evidence of the factors certified under subsection 1 may be presented to the court at an involuntary treatment hearing held pursuant to sections 25-03.1-19 and 25-03.1-22, or at a separate hearing after motion and notice. The court in ruling on the requested authorization for involuntary treatment with prescribed medication shall consider all relevant evidence presented at the hearing, including:

The danger the patient presents to self or others;

The patient’s current condition;

The patient’s treatment history;

The results of previous medication trials;

The efficacy of current or past treatment modalities concerning the patient;

The patient’s prognosis; and

The effect of the patient’s mental condition on the patient’s capacity to consent.

Involuntary treatment with prescribed medication may not be authorized by the court solely for the convenience of facility staff or for the purpose of punishment.

If the factors certified under subsection 1 have been demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence, the court may include in its involuntary treatment order a provision, or it may issue a separate order after notice and hearing, authorizing the tier 1b mental health professional to involuntarily treat the patient with prescribed medication on such terms and conditions as are appropriate. The order for involuntary treatment with prescribed medication, however, may not be in effect for more than ninety days.

If a patient has requested an examination by an independent expert examiner under this chapter, and if the tier 1b mental health professional has requested authorization for involuntary treatment with prescribed medication, only a psychiatrist or final year psychiatric resident physician may independently examine the patient as to the issue of involuntary treatment with prescribed medication.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 292, § 3; 1993, ch. 279, § 10; 2003, ch. 224, § 2; 2015, ch. 201, § 10, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 97, § 24, effective August 1, 2017.

25-03.1-18.2.
Guardian consent to involuntary treatment with prescribed medication.

Notwithstanding sections 25-03.1-16, 25-03.1-18.1, and 25-03.1-24, if a patient refuses treatment with prescribed medication, a treating physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, or advanced practice registered nurse may treat the patient with prescribed medication upon consent of the patient’s guardian pursuant to subsection 6 of section 30.1-28-12.

The guardian’s consent for involuntary treatment with prescribed medication may not be in effect for more than ninety days without receiving another recommendation and determination pursuant to subsection 6 of section 30.1-28-12.

The patient has the right to be free of the effects of medication at the preliminary or treatment hearing by discontinuance of medication no later than twenty-four hours before the hearing unless, in the opinion of the prescriber, the need for the medication still exists or discontinuation would hamper the patient’s preparation for and participation in the proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 231, § 1, effective April 17, 2017.

25-03.1-19.
Involuntary treatment hearing.

The involuntary treatment hearing, unless waived by the respondent or the respondent has been released as a person not requiring treatment, must be held within fourteen days of the preliminary hearing. If the preliminary hearing is not required, the involuntary treatment hearing must be held within four days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, of the date the court received the expert examiner’s report, not to exceed fourteen days from the time the petition was served. The court may extend the time for hearing for good cause. The respondent has the right to an examination by an independent expert examiner if so requested. If the respondent is indigent, the county of residence of the respondent shall pay for the cost of the examination and the respondent may choose an independent expert examiner.

The hearing must be held in the county of the respondent’s residence or location or the county in which the state hospital or treatment facility treating the respondent is located, if the respondent requests a change of venue. At the hearing, evidence in support of the petition must be presented by the state’s attorney, private counsel, or counsel designated by the court. During the hearing, the petitioner and the respondent must be afforded an opportunity to testify and to present and cross-examine witnesses. The court may receive the testimony of any other interested person. All individuals not necessary for the conduct of the proceeding must be excluded, except that the court may admit individuals having a legitimate interest in the proceeding. The hearing must be conducted in as informal a manner as practical, but the issue must be tried as a civil matter. Discovery and the power of subpoena permitted under the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure are available to the respondent. The court shall receive all relevant and material evidence that may be offered as governed by the North Dakota Rules of Evidence. There is a presumption in favor of the respondent, and the burden of proof in support of the petition is upon the petitioner.

If, upon completion of the hearing, the court finds the petition has not been sustained by clear and convincing evidence, the court shall deny the petition, terminate the proceeding, and order the respondent be discharged if the respondent has been hospitalized before the hearing.

Except for good cause, the court may not consider a medical record or expert examiner’s report relating to the respondent unless the petitioner and respondent receive the medical record or the expert examiner’s report at least twenty-four hours before the hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 19; 1979, ch. 334, § 18; 1989, ch. 149, § 15; 2003, ch. 227, § 2; 2015, ch. 201, § 11, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 223, § 3, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 222, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 25-03.1-19 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 5 of Chapter 222, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1117; and Section 3 of Chapter 223, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1034.

Cross-References.

Discovery, see N.D.R.Civ.P. 26 to 37.

Subpoena, see N.D.R.Civ.P. 45.

25-03.1-20.
Involuntary treatment hearing — Findings and dispositions.

If an individual is found at the involuntary treatment hearing to be a person requiring treatment, the findings and conclusions must be entered in the record of the proceedings and the court may:

Order the individual to undergo a program of treatment other than hospitalization;

Order the individual hospitalized in a public institution; or

Order the individual hospitalized in any other private hospital if the attending physician agrees. The reason supporting the court’s particular treatment order must be entered in the record.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 20.

25-03.1-21.
Involuntary treatment order — Alternatives to hospitalization — Noncompliance with alternative treatment order — Emergency detention by certain professionals — Application for continuing treatment order.

Before the court makes a decision in an involuntary treatment hearing, the court shall review a report assessing the availability and appropriateness for the respondent of treatment programs other than hospitalization which has been prepared and submitted by the state hospital or treatment facility. If the court finds a treatment program other than hospitalization is adequate to meet the respondent’s treatment needs and is sufficient to prevent serious risk of harm, the court shall order the respondent to receive whatever treatment, other than hospitalization, is appropriate for a period of ninety days.

If the respondent is not complying with the alternative treatment order or the alternative treatment has not been sufficient to prevent serious risk of harm, the department, a representative of the treatment program involved in the alternative treatment order, the petitioner’s retained attorney, or the state’s attorney may apply to the court or to the district court of a different judicial district in which the respondent is located to modify the alternative treatment order. The court shall hold a hearing within seven days after the application is filed and served on the respondent. Based upon the evidence presented at the hearing and other available information, the court may:

Continue the alternative treatment order;

Consider other alternatives to hospitalization, modify the court’s original order, and direct the respondent undergo another program of alternative treatment for the remainder of the ninety-day period; or

Enter a new order directing the respondent be hospitalized until discharged from the hospital under section 25-03.1-30. If the respondent refuses to comply with this hospitalization order, the court may direct a peace officer to take the respondent into protective custody and transport the respondent to a treatment facility.

If a peace officer, physician either in person or directing an emergency medical services professional, or any mental health professional reasonably believes the respondent is not complying with an order for alternative treatment, that the alternative treatment is not sufficient to prevent serious risk of harm , and that considerations of time and safety do not allow intervention by a court, the designated professional may cause the respondent to be taken into custody and detained at a treatment facility as provided in subsection 3 of section 25-03.1-25 and, within twenty-four hours, shall file a notice with the court stating the circumstances and factors of the case. The state hospital or public treatment facility immediately shall accept, if appropriately screened and medically stable, and a private treatment facility may accept, the respondent on a provisional basis. The superintendent or director shall require an immediate examination of the respondent and, within twenty-four hours after admission, shall release the respondent subject to the conditions of the original order or file a notice with the court stating in detail the circumstances and factors of the case. The court , within forty-eight hours of receipt of the notice of the superintendent or director, after a hearing and based on the evidence presented and other available information, shall:

Release the respondent from hospitalization and continue the alternative treatment order;

Consider other alternatives to hospitalization, modify the original order of the court, and direct the respondent undergo another program of alternative treatment for the remainder of the commitment period; or

Enter a new order directing the respondent remain hospitalized until discharged from the hospital under section 25-03.1-30.

If, at the date of expiration of an order of alternative treatment, it is believed an individual continues to require treatment, a petition for a determination that the individual continues to be a person requiring treatment may be filed with the court where the individual is located.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 21; 1979, ch. 334, § 19; 1987, ch. 323, § 1; 1989, ch. 149, § 16; 1991, ch. 326, § 73; 2009, ch. 239, § 5; 2013, ch. 223, § 1; 2015, ch. 201, § 12, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 226, § 4, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 222, § 6, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-22.
Length of involuntary and continuing treatment orders.

An order for involuntary treatment following a preliminary hearing may not exceed fourteen days. An order for involuntary treatment following a treatment hearing may not exceed ninety days.

If the director or superintendent believes a patient continues to require treatment, the director or superintendent, not less than fourteen days before the expiration of the initial order, shall petition the court where the facility is located for a determination that the patient continues to be a person requiring treatment and for an order of continuing treatment, which order may be for a period not to exceed one year. The court shall set a hearing date that must be within fourteen days after the petition was filed, unless extended for good cause shown.

A respondent subject to a continuing treatment order of indefinite duration retains the rights to periodic review and to petition for discharge under section 25-03.1-31 as that section existed on July 31, 1993.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 22; 1979, ch. 334, § 20; 1989, ch. 149, § 17; 1993, ch. 279, § 11; 2021, ch. 222, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-23.
Petition for continuing treatment orders.

A petition for an order authorizing continuing treatment must contain a statement setting forth the specific facts that are the basis of the determination the patient continues to be a person requiring treatment; a statement describing the treatment program provided to the patient and the results of that treatment; and a clinical estimate as to how long further treatment will be required. The petition must be accompanied by a certificate executed by a physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, psychologist, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed addiction counselor, any of whom is practicing within that individual’s professional scope of practice.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 23; 1979, ch. 334, § 21; 1993, ch. 279, § 12; 2011, ch. 205, § 1; 2015, ch. 201, § 13, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 222, § 8, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-24.
Right to treat.

State hospital or treatment facility personnel may treat a patient with prescribed medication or a less restrictive alternative if, in the opinion of a psychiatrist or physician, these treatments are necessary to prevent bodily harm to the patient or others or to prevent imminent deterioration of the respondent’s physical or mental condition and there is not time to obtain a court order. This chapter does not prohibit a hospital from rendering emergency medical care without the need for consultation, if in the exercise of sound medical judgment that care is immediately necessary and delay would endanger the life of or adversely and substantially affect the health of the patient.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 24; 1979, ch. 334, § 22; 1995, ch. 268, § 1.

25-03.1-25.
Detention or hospitalization — Emergency procedure.

When a peace officer, physician either in person or directing an emergency medical services professional, psychiatrist, physician assistant, psychologist, advanced practice registered nurse, or mental health professional has reasonable cause to believe that an individual is a person requiring treatment and there exists a serious risk of harm to that individual, others, or property of an immediate nature that considerations of safety do not allow preliminary intervention by a magistrate, the peace officer, physician either in person or directing an emergency medical services professional, psychiatrist, physician assistant, psychologist, advanced practice registered nurse, or mental health professional, using the screening process set forth in section 25-03.1-04, may cause the individual to be taken into custody and detained at a treatment facility as provided in subsection 3, and subject to section 25-03.1-26, except that if emergency conditions exist that prevent the immediate conveyance of the individual to a public treatment facility, a private facility that has adequate resources and capacity to hold that individual may hold the individual in anticipation of conveyance to a public treatment facility for up to twenty-three hours:

Without conducting an immediate examination required under section 25-03.1-26; and

Without following notice and hearing requirements for a transfer to another treatment facility required under subsection 3 of section 25-03.1-34.

If a petitioner seeking the involuntary treatment of a respondent requests that the respondent be taken into immediate custody and the magistrate, upon reviewing the petition and accompanying documentation, finds probable cause to believe that the respondent is a person requiring treatment and there exists a serious risk of harm to the respondent, others, or property if allowed to remain at liberty, the magistrate may enter a written order directing that the respondent be taken into immediate custody and be detained as provided in subsection 3 until the preliminary or treatment hearing, which must be held no more than seven days after the date of the order.

Detention under this section may be:

In a treatment facility where the director or superintendent must be informed of the reasons why immediate custody has been ordered. The facility may provide treatment that is necessary to preserve the respondent’s life or to appropriately control behavior by the respondent which is likely to result in physical injury to self or to others if allowed to continue, but may not otherwise provide treatment to the respondent without the respondent’s consent; or

In a public or private facility in the community which is suitably equipped and staffed for the purpose. Detention in a jail or other correctional facility may not be ordered except in cases of actual emergency when no other secure facility is accessible, and then only for a period of not more than twenty-four hours and under close supervision.

Immediately upon being taken into custody, the individual must be advised of the purpose of custody, of the intended uses and possible effects of any evaluation that the individual undergoes, and of the individual’s rights to counsel and to a preliminary or treatment hearing.

Upon arrival at a facility the peace officer, physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, psychologist, advanced practice registered nurse, or mental health professional who conveyed the individual or who caused the individual to be conveyed shall complete an application for evaluation and shall deliver a detailed written report from the peace officer, physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, psychologist, advanced practice registered nurse, or the mental health professional who caused the individual to be conveyed. The written report must state the circumstances under which the individual was taken into custody. The report must allege in detail the overt act that constituted the basis for the beliefs that the individual is a person requiring treatment and that, because of that individual’s condition, there exists a serious risk of harm to that individual, others, or property if the individual is not immediately detained.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 25; 1979, ch. 334, § 23; 1983, ch. 314, § 3; 1989, ch. 149, § 18; 1993, ch. 279, § 13; 1995, ch. 269, § 1; 2009, ch. 239, § 6; 2013, ch. 223, § 2; 2015, ch. 201, § 14, effective August 1, 2015.

25-03.1-26.
Emergency procedure — Acceptance of petition and individual — Notice — Court hearing set.

A public treatment facility immediately shall accept and a private treatment facility may accept on a provisional basis the application and the individual admitted under section 25-03.1-25. The superintendent or director shall require an immediate examination of the subject and, either within twenty-four hours, exclusive of holidays, after admission or within seventy-two hours after admission, exclusive of holidays, if the individual is admitted with a serious physical condition or illness that requires prompt treatment, shall either:

Release the individual if the superintendent or director finds that the subject does not meet the emergency commitment standards; or

File a petition if one has not been filed with the court of the individual’s residence or the court which directed immediate custody under subsection 2 of section 25-03.1-25, giving notice to the court and stating in detail the circumstances and facts of the case.

Upon receipt of the petition and notice of the emergency detention, the magistrate shall set a date for a preliminary hearing, if the respondent is alleged to be a person who is mentally ill or a person who is both mentally ill and has a substance use disorder, or a treatment hearing, if the respondent is alleged to be a person who has a substance use disorder, to be held no later than four days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, after detention unless the person has been released as a person not requiring treatment, has been voluntarily admitted for treatment, has requested or agreed to a continuance, or unless the hearing has been extended by the magistrate for good cause shown. The magistrate shall appoint counsel if one has not been retained by the respondent.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 26; 1979, ch. 334, § 24; 1983, ch. 314, § 4; 1985, ch. 309, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 19; 1989, ch. 149, § 19; 1993, ch. 279, § 14; 2003, ch. 227, § 3; 2015, ch. 201, § 15, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 350, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 223, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-27.
Notice and statement of rights.

If an individual is detained for emergency evaluation and treatment under this chapter, the superintendent or director shall cause both the patient and, if possible, a responsible member of the patient’s immediate family, a guardian, or a friend, if any, to receive:

A copy of the petition that asserted the individual is a person requiring treatment.

A written statement explaining the individual will be examined by an expert examiner within twenty-four hours of hospitalization, excluding holidays.

A written statement in simple terms explaining the rights of the individual alleged to be a person who is mentally ill or a person who is both mentally ill and has a substance use disorder to a preliminary hearing, to be present at the hearing, and to be represented by legal counsel, if the individual is certified by an expert examiner or examiners as a person requiring treatment.

A written statement in simple terms explaining the rights of the individual to a treatment hearing, to be present at the hearing, to be represented by legal counsel, and the right to an independent medical evaluation.

If the individual is unable to read or understand the written materials, every reasonable effort must be made to explain the written material in a language the individual understands, and a note of the explanation and by whom made must be entered into the patient record.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 27; 1979, ch. 334, § 25; 1989, ch. 149, § 20; 1993, ch. 279, § 15; 2015, ch. 201, § 16, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 223, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Rights of patients generally, see §§ 25-03.1-40, 25-03.1-41.

Right to counsel, see § 25-03.1-13.

Right to equal care and treatment, see § 25-02-09.

25-03.1-28.
Records and proceedings.

A record must be made of all court hearings conducted under this chapter and a copy must be provided to the respondent upon request for purposes of appellate review of the proceedings. If the respondent is indigent, the copy must be provided free of charge, with the expense thereof borne by the county of residence of the respondent.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 28.

25-03.1-29.
Appeal.

The respondent has the right to an expedited appeal from an order of involuntary commitment or alternative treatment, an order modifying a treatment order, an alternative treatment order or less restrictive treatment order, a continuing treatment order, an order denying a petition for discharge, or an order of transfer. Upon entry of an appealable order, the court shall notify the respondent of the right of appeal and the right to counsel. The notice of appeal must be filed within thirty days after the order has been entered. Such appeal must be to the supreme court and the hearing must be commenced within fourteen days of filing of the notice of appeal. The hearing must be limited to a review of the procedures, findings, and conclusions of the lower court. The name of the respondent may not appear on the record on appeal.

Pending appeal, the order appealed from remains in effect, unless the supreme court determines otherwise. The respondent may not be denied the opportunity to be present at the appeal hearing, and the court conducting the appeal may issue such interim order as will assure this opportunity to the respondent while protecting the interest sought to be served by the order appealed from.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 29; 1979, ch. 334, § 26; 1981, ch. 320, § 47; 1987, ch. 324, § 1; 2021, ch. 222, § 9, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Procedures governing expedited appeals, see N.D.R.App.P. 2.1.

25-03.1-30.
Discharge of hospitalized patient — Transfer to alternative treatment — Termination of alternative treatment.

The superintendent or director at any time may discharge a voluntarily hospitalized patient who is clinically suitable for discharge.

The superintendent or director shall discharge a patient hospitalized by court order if the patient’s mental condition is such that the patient no longer is a person requiring treatment.

If a patient discharged under subsection 1 or 2 has been hospitalized by a court order, or if court proceedings are pending, the treatment facility shall notify the court of the discharge.

A person responsible for providing treatment, other than hospitalization, to an individual ordered to undergo a program of alternative treatment may terminate the alternative treatment if the patient is clinically suitable for termination of treatment. The person shall terminate the alternative treatment if the patient no longer is a person requiring treatment and shall notify the court upon that termination.

If, upon the discharge of a hospitalized patient or the termination of alternative treatment of an individual under this chapter, the individual would benefit from further treatment, the hospital or provider of alternative treatment shall offer appropriate treatment on a voluntary basis or shall aid the individual to obtain treatment from another source on a voluntary basis.

With the individual’s consent, the superintendent or director shall notify the appropriate community agencies or persons of the release and of the suggested release plan. Community agencies include regional mental health centers, state and local counseling services, public and private associations the function of which is to assist persons who are mentally ill or individuals with a substance use disorder, and the individual’s physician.

The agencies and persons notified of the individual’s release shall report to the facility that initial contact with the individual has been accomplished.

If, before expiration of an initial treatment order, the superintendent or director determines a less restrictive form of treatment is more appropriate for a patient hospitalized by court order, the superintendent or director may petition the court that last ordered the patient’s hospitalization to modify the order of the court. The petition must contain statements setting forth the reasons for the determination the patient continues to be a person requiring treatment, the reasons for the determination a less restrictive form of treatment is more appropriate for the patient, and describing the recommended treatment program. If the patient consents, without a hearing, the court may modify the treatment order of the court by directing the patient to undergo the agreed treatment program for the remainder of the treatment order. The patient must be given an opportunity to protest the discharge and modification of treatment order and to receive a hearing on the merits of the protest.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 30; 1977, ch. 240, § 1; 1979, ch. 334, § 28; 1989, ch. 149, § 21; 1993, ch. 279, § 16; 2019, ch. 226, § 5, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 223, § 6, effective August 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Habeas corpus on ground of restoration to sanity of one confined as incompetent other than in connection with crime, 21 A.L.R.2d 1004.

Liability of one releasing institutionalized mental patient for harm he causes, 38 A.L.R.3d 699.

Law Reviews.

Article: The Tail Still Wags the Dog: The Pervasive and Inappropriate Influence by the Psychiatric Profession on the Civil Commitment Process, see 86 N.D. L. Rev. 259 (2010).

25-03.1-31.
Procedure to extend continuing treatment orders — Respondent’s right to petition for discharge.

If the director or superintendent believes that a respondent continues to be a person requiring treatment, the director or superintendent, not less than thirty days before expiration of the order, shall petition the court where the facility is located for another continuing treatment order in the manner prescribed by section 25-03.1-23. The petition must also contain a notice to the respondent that, unless the respondent waives a hearing on the petition within fifteen days after service of the petition upon the respondent, a hearing will be held by the court. The court shall appoint counsel for the respondent upon receipt of the petition, unless retained counsel has appeared on behalf of the respondent. If retained counsel has appeared, the court shall provide notice of the petition to the attorney. If the hearing is not waived, it must be held within thirty days after the petition was filed, unless extended for good cause shown. The burden of proof is the same as in an involuntary treatment hearing.

Every individual subject to an order of continuing treatment has the right to petition the court for discharge once annually. The petition may be presented to the court or a representative of the facility who shall transmit it to the court forthwith. If the patient is indigent or is unable for reasons satisfactory to the court to obtain an independent expert examiner, the court shall appoint an independent expert examiner to examine the patient and to furnish a report to the court. The court shall set a hearing date which must be within fourteen days of receipt of the examiner’s report. At the hearing, the burden of proof is the same as in an involuntary treatment hearing.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 31; 1979, ch. 334, § 29; 1993, ch. 279, § 17.

25-03.1-32.
Periodic hearing and petition for discharge — Continuing hospitalization. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 334, § 33.

25-03.1-33.
Legal incompetence — Presumption — Finding — Adjudication negated.

No determination that a person requires treatment, no court order authorizing hospitalization or alternative treatment, nor any form of admission to a hospital gives rise to a presumption of, constitutes a finding of, or operates as an adjudication of legal incompetence, or of the inability to give or withhold consent.

No order of commitment under any previous statute of this state, in the absence of a concomitant appointment of a guardian, constitutes a finding of or operates as an adjudication of legal incompetence, or of the inability to give or withhold consent.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 33; 1993, ch. 279, § 18.

25-03.1-34.
Transfer of patients.

The superintendent or director of a treatment facility may transfer, or authorize the transfer of, an involuntary patient from a hospital to another facility if the superintendent or director determines it would be consistent with the medical needs of the patient to do so. Due consideration must be given to the relationship of the patient to family, legal guardian, or friends, so as to maintain relationships and encourage visits beneficial to the patient. If a treatment facility licensed by any state for the care and treatment of persons who are mentally ill or individuals with a substance use disorder agrees with the patient or patient’s guardian to accept the patient for treatment, the superintendent or director of the treatment facility shall release the patient to the other facility.

Upon receipt of notice from an agency of the United States that facilities are available for the care or treatment of any individual ordered hospitalized who is eligible for care or treatment in a treatment facility of that agency, the superintendent or director of the treatment facility may cause the individual’s transfer to that agency of the United States for treatment. An individual may not be transferred to any agency of the United States if the individual is confined pursuant to conviction of any felony or misdemeanor or the individual has been acquitted of the charge solely on the ground of mental illness unless the court originally ordering confinement of the individual enters an order for transfer after appropriate motion and hearing. An individual transferred under this section to an agency of the United States is deemed committed to that agency under the original order of treatment.

A facility may not transfer a patient to another hospital or agency without first notifying the patient and the patient’s legal guardian, spouse, or next of kin, if known, or a chosen friend of the patient and the court that ordered treatment. The patient must be given an opportunity to protest the transfer and to receive a hearing on the protest. The patient’s objection to the transfer must be presented to the court where the facility is located or to a representative of the facility within seven days after the notice of transfer was received. If the objection is presented to a representative of the facility, the representative shall transmit the objection to the court. The court shall set a hearing date, which must be within fourteen days of the date of receipt of the objection. If an objection has not been filed or the patient consents to a transfer, the court may enter an ex parte order authorizing transfer.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 239, § 34; 1979, ch. 334, § 30; 1989, ch. 149, § 22; 1993, ch. 279, § 19; 2009, ch. 239, § 7; 2021, ch. 223, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

25-03.1-34.1.
Exchange of individuals with a substance use disorder. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The director of the department of human services, a county, a city, or a local law enforcement agency may enter into reciprocal agreements with the appropriate authorities of any other state regarding the mutual exchange, return, and transportation of individuals with a mental illness or substance use disorder who are treated or confined in hospitals of one state for treatment of a substance use disorder or mental illness but who have legal residence in another state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 270, § 1; 2019, ch. 225, § 10, effective August 1, 2019.

25-03.1-34.1.
Exchange of individuals with a substance use disorder. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The director of the department of health and human services, a county, a city, or a local law enforcement agency may enter into reciprocal agreements with the appropriate authorities of any other state regarding the mutual exchange, return, and transportation of individuals with a mental illness or substance use disorder who are treated or confined in hospitals of one state for treatment of a substance use disorder or mental illness but who have legal residence in another state.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 270, § 1; 2019, ch. 225, § 10, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 278, effective September 1, 2022.